Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1470
Sublessee, defined.

Sublessee shall mean any person who rents or leases a mobile home from a tenant, but shall not include a person who rents or leases a space in a mobile home park. A tenant-sublessee relationship shall be governed by the Uniform Residential Landlord and Tenant Act.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 21.

Uniform Residential Landlord and Tenant Act, see section 76-1401.